Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.015

Definitions.

(1) "Airport charges" means charges of an airport operator for tie-downs, landing fees, the occupation of a hangar by an aircraft, and all other charges owing or to become owing under a contract between an aircraft owner and an airport operator or under an officially adopted regulation and/or tariff including, but not limited to, the cost of sale and related expenses.

(2) "Aircraft" means every species of aircraft or other mechanical device capable of being used for the purpose of aerial flight.

(3) "Airport operator" means any municipality as defined in RCW 14.08.010(2) or state agency which owns and/or operates an airport.

(4) "Owner" means (a) every natural person, firm, partnership, corporation, association, trust, estate, or organization, or agent thereof with actual or apparent authority, who expressly or impliedly contracts for use of airport property for landing, parking, or hangaring aircraft, and (b) includes the registered owner or owners and lienholders of record with the federal aviation administration.

[ 1987 c 254 s 1.]